California statutes. Civil Code
(D) A shared mobility service provider shall keep an up-to-date list of its users that maintain their own liability insurance coverage that meets or exceeds the requirements of subparagraph (A). The provider shall annually transmit information on the percentage of its total users in the state that maintain their own insurance coverage, in the same manner as proscribed in subdivision (b) of Section 2505.5 of the Civil Code, to the Department of Insurance.

(3) Effective July 1, 2023, nothing in this section shall prohibit a provider from requiring a user to enter into an indemnity contract whereby the user will indemnify the provider for the user’s proportionate
 share of liability. The indemnity contract shall not require the user to defend or indemnify the provider for the provider’s negligence or willful misconduct. This section shall not be waived or modified by contractual agreement, act, or omission of the parties.

(c) (1) A city or county that authorizes a provider to operate within its jurisdiction on or after January 1, 2021, shall adopt rules for the operation, parking, and maintenance of shared mobility devices before a provider may offer any shared mobility device for rent or use in the city or county by any of the following:

(A) Ordinance.

(B) Agreement.

(C) Permit terms.

(2) A city or county that authorized a provider to operate within its jurisdiction before January 1, 2021, and continues to provide that authorization shall adopt rules for the operation, parking, and maintenance of shared mobility devices by January 1, 2022, by any of the following:

(A) Ordinance.

(B) Agreement.

(C) Permit terms.

(3) A provider shall comply with all applicable rules, agreements, and permit terms established pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a city or county from adopting
 any ordinance or regulation that is not inconsistent with this title.

(e) On or before July 1, 2023, a shared mobility service provider shall disclose to its customers that the customer’s existing homeowner’s, renter’s, or automobile insurance policies might not provide coverage for liability resulting from the use of shared mobility devices and that the customer should contact their insurance company or insurance agent to determine if coverage is provided, prior to allowing a user to initiate their first use of a device.

(1) The disclosure shall be made to, and acknowledged by, the customer via the provider’s digital application or electronic platform and posted on the provider’s internet website.

(2) The disclosure
 shall include the following language in capital letters:
“YOUR HOMEOWNER’S, RENTER’S, OR AUTOMOBILE INSURANCE POLICIES MIGHT NOT PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR ACCIDENTS INVOLVING THE USE OF THIS DEVICE. TO DETERMINE IF COVERAGE IS PROVIDED YOU SHOULD CONTACT YOUR INSURANCE COMPANY OR AGENT.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 440, Sec. 1.   (AB 458)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2505.5.

(a) The Department of Insurance shall conduct a study and report the findings to the Legislature and the insurance committees of both houses no later than December 31, 2026, that does all of the following:

 (1) In collaboration with a city or county with jurisdiction over areas of shared mobility device use and shared mobility device insurers and operators, assesses whether coverage requirements for shared mobility devices are appropriate to the risk of shared mobility device services and provide
 recommendations to update coverage requirements, if found to be necessary. The Department of Insurance may specify by bulletin the time periods and elements of data to be provided by admitted and nonadmitted insurers writing coverage pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2505.

(2) With input from shared mobility device providers, analyzes the process by which providers give users an option to purchase their own insurance coverage, and make recommendations, if necessary, on how to strengthen the market for individual mobility device liability coverage, including on ensuring agreements between a provider and user to remove the user from the provider’s policy do not result in circumstances where there is a gap in coverage providing recovery for injured
 pedestrians.

(3) (A) In collaboration with a city or county with jurisdiction over areas of shared mobility device use and shared mobility device insurers and operators, assesses whether there is a need for insurance coverage for injuries to, or death of, a pedestrian or property damage to assistive technology devices when the injury, death, or property damage involves, in whole or in part, the following devices:

(i) A bicycle propelled exclusively by human power, as described in Section 231 of the Vehicle Code. For purposes of this paragraph, “bicycle” shall not include an electric bicycle.

(ii) A class 1 electric bicycle as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 312.5 of the Vehicle Code.

(iii) A class 2 electric bicycle as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 312.5 of the Vehicle Code.

(B) It is the intent of the Legislature that the assessment in subparagraph (A) of this section will provide data on the prevalence of injuries, death, or property damage resulting from the devices described in clauses (i), (ii), and (iii) of subparagraph (A), including, but not limited to, resulting from such devices being negligently abandoned on pedestrian walkways, and determine whether additional insurance coverage is necessary to account for such pedestrian injuries or death and property damage.

(b) Data collected by the Department of Insurance pursuant to this section shall not include information that identifies or describes an individual,
 including, but not limited to, an individual’s name, social security number, home address, home telephone number, education, financial matters, medical or employment history, geolocation, or statements made by, or attributed to, the
 individual, or that may otherwise compromise the privacy of the individual under existing law.

(c) (1) A report to be submitted pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 740, Sec. 2.   (AB 371)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2506.

(a) A shared mobility service provider shall affix to each shared mobility device a readily accessible, single, and clearly displayed tactile sign containing raised characters and accompanying braille that complies with Section 11B-703 of the California Building Code, except that the raised characters shall be, at minimum, one-half inch high and in a color that contrasts with the signage background, in order to identify the device for the purpose of reporting illegal or negligent activity. The sign shall minimally consist of the company name and telephone number of the service provider that is visible from a minimum of five feet and not obfuscated by branding or other markings.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2024.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 36, Sec. 2.   (AB 410)   Effective July 6, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 11. PHARMACEUTICAL SERVICES [2527. - 2528.]

2527.

(a) On or after January 1, 1984, no prescription drug claims processor, as defined in subdivision (b), shall enter into or perform any provision of any new contract, or perform any provision of any existing contract, with a licensed California pharmacy, or process or assist in the processing of any prescription drug claim submitted by or otherwise involving a service of a licensed California pharmacy unless the processor is in compliance with subdivisions (c) and (d).

(b) A “prescription drug claims processor,” as used in this part, means any nongovernmental entity which
 has a contractual relationship with purchasers of prepaid or insured prescription drug benefits, and which processes, consults, advises on, or otherwise assists in the processing of prepaid or insured prescription drug benefit claims submitted by a licensed California pharmacy or patron thereof. A “prescription drug claims processor” shall not include insurers (as defined in Section 23 of the Insurance Code), health care service plans (as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 1345 of the Health and Safety Code), nonprofit hospital service plans (pursuant to Chapter 11A, (commencing with Section 11491) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code), pharmacy permitholders (pursuant to Section 4080 of the Business and Professions Code), employers, trusts, and other entities which assume the risks of pharmaceutical services for designated beneficiaries. Also, a “prescription drug claims processor” shall not include insurers, health care service plans, and nonprofit hospital service plans which process claims on
 a nonrisk basis for self-insured clients.

(c) On or before January 1, 1984, every prescription drug claims processor shall have conducted or obtained the results of a study or studies which identifies the fees, separate from ingredient costs, of all, or of a statistically significant sample, of California pharmacies, for pharmaceutical dispensing services to private consumers. The study or studies shall meet reasonable professional standards of the statistical profession. The determination of the pharmacy’s fee made for purposes of the study or studies shall be computed by reviewing a sample of the pharmacy’s usual charges for a random or other representative sample of commonly prescribed drug products, subtracting the average wholesale price of drug ingredients, and averaging the resulting fees by dividing the aggregate of the fees by the number of prescriptions reviewed. A study report shall include a preface, an explanatory summary of the
 results and findings including a comparison of the fees of California pharmacies by setting forth the mean fee and standard deviation, the range of fees and fee percentiles (10th, 20th, 30th, 40th, 50th, 60th, 70th, 80th, 90th). This study or these studies shall be conducted or obtained no less often than every 24 months.

(d) The study report or reports obtained pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be transmitted by certified mail by each prescription drug claims processor to the chief executive officer or designee, of each client for whom it performs claims processing services. Consistent with subdivision (c), the processor shall transmit the study or studies to clients no less often than every 24 months.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a prescription drug claims processor to transmit to its clients more than two studies meeting the requirements of subdivision (c) during any such
 24-month period.

Effective January 1, 1986, a claims processor may comply with subdivision (c) and this subdivision, in the event that no new study or studies meeting the criteria of subdivision (c) have been conducted or obtained subsequent to January 1, 1984, by transmitting the same study or studies previously transmitted, with notice of cost-of-living changes as measured by the Consumer Price Index (CPI) of the United States Department of Labor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 296, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2528.

A violation of Section 2527 may result only in imposition of a civil remedy, which includes, but is not limited to, imposition of statutory damages of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) depending on the severity or gravity of the violation, plus reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, declaratory and injunctive relief, and any other relief which the court deems proper. Any owner of a licensed California pharmacy shall have standing to bring an action seeking a civil remedy pursuant to this section so long as his or her pharmacy has a contractual relationship with, or renders pharmaceutical services to, a
 beneficiary of a client of the prescription drug claims processor, against whom the action is brought provided that no such action may be commenced by the owner unless he or she has notified the processor in writing as to the nature of the alleged violation and the processor fails to remedy the violation within 30 days from the receipt of the notice or fails to undertake steps to remedy the violation within that period and complete the steps promptly thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 296, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 12. INDEMNITY [2772. - 2784.5.]

2772.

Indemnity is a contract by which one engages to save another from a legal consequence of the conduct of one of the parties, or of some other person.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

[2773.]

Section Twenty-seven Hundred and Seventy-three. An agreement to indemnify a person against an act thereafter to be done, is void, if the act be known by such person at the time of doing it to be unlawful.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

2774.

An agreement to indemnify a person against an act already done, is valid, even though the act was known to be wrongful, unless it was a felony.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2775.

An agreement to indemnify against the acts of a certain person, applies not only to his acts and their consequences, but also to those of his agents.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2776.

An agreement to indemnify several persons applies to each, unless a contrary intention appears.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2777.

One who indemnifies another against an act to be done by the latter, is liable jointly with the person indemnified, and separately, to every person injured by such act.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2778.

In the interpretation of a contract of indemnity, the following rules are to be applied, unless a contrary intention appears:

1. Upon an indemnity against liability, expressly, or in other equivalent terms, the person indemnified is entitled to recover upon becoming liable;

2. Upon an indemnity against claims, or demands, or damages, or costs, expressly, or in other equivalent terms, the person indemnified is not entitled to recover without payment thereof;

3. An indemnity against claims, or
 demands, or liability, expressly, or in other equivalent terms, embraces the costs of defense against such claims, demands, or liability incurred in good faith, and in the exercise of a reasonable discretion;

4. The person indemnifying is bound, on request of the person indemnified, to defend actions or proceedings brought against the latter in respect to the matters embraced by the indemnity, but the person indemnified has the right to conduct such defenses, if he chooses to do so;

5. If, after request, the person indemnifying neglects to defend the person indemnified, a recovery against the latter suffered by him in good faith, is conclusive in his favor against the former;

6. If the person indemnifying, whether he is a principal or a surety in the agreement, has not reasonable notice of the action or proceeding
 against the person indemnified, or is not allowed to control its defense, judgment against the latter is only presumptive evidence against the former;

7. A stipulation that a judgment against the person indemnified shall be conclusive upon the person indemnifying, is inapplicable if he had a good defense upon the merits, which by want of ordinary care he failed to establish in the action.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2779.

Where one, at the request of another, engages to answer in damages, whether liquidated or unliquidated, for any violation of duty on the part of the latter, he is entitled to be reimbursed in the same manner as a surety, for whatever he may pay.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2782.

(a) Except as provided in Sections 2782.1, 2782.2, 2782.5, and 2782.6, provisions, clauses, covenants, or agreements contained in, collateral to, or affecting any construction contract and that purport to indemnify the promisee against liability for damages for death or bodily injury to persons, injury to property, or any other loss, damage or expense arising from the sole negligence or willful misconduct
 of the promisee or the promisee’s agents, servants, or independent contractors who are directly responsible to the promisee, or for defects in design furnished by those persons, are against public policy and are void and unenforceable; provided, however, that this section shall not affect the validity of any insurance contract, workers’ compensation, or agreement issued by an admitted insurer as defined by the Insurance Code.

(b) (1) Except as provided in Sections 2782.1, 2782.2, and 2782.5, provisions, clauses, covenants, or agreements contained in, collateral to, or affecting any construction contract with a public agency entered into before January 1, 2013, that purport to impose on the contractor, or relieve the public agency from, liability for the active negligence of the public agency are void and unenforceable.

(2) Except as provided in Sections
 2782.1, 2782.2, and 2782.5, provisions, clauses, covenants, or agreements contained in, collateral to, or affecting any construction contract with a public agency entered into on or after January 1, 2013, that purport to impose on any contractor, subcontractor, or supplier of goods or services, or relieve the public agency from, liability for the active negligence of the public agency are void and unenforceable.

(c) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (d) and Sections 2782.1, 2782.2, and 2782.5, provisions, clauses, covenants, or agreements contained in, collateral to, or affecting any construction contract entered into on or after January 1, 2013, with the owner of privately owned real property to be improved and as to which the owner is not acting as a contractor or supplier of materials or equipment to the work, that purport to impose on any contractor, subcontractor, or supplier of goods or services, or relieve the
 owner from, liability are unenforceable to the extent of the active negligence of the owner, including that of its employees.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, an owner of privately owned real property to be improved includes the owner of any interest therein, other than a mortgage or other interest that is held solely as security for performance of an obligation.

(3) This subdivision shall not apply to a homeowner performing a home improvement project on his or her own single family dwelling.

(d) For all construction contracts, and amendments thereto, entered into after January 1, 2009, for residential construction, as used in Title 7 (commencing with Section 895) of Part 2 of Division 2, all provisions, clauses, covenants, and agreements contained in, collateral to, or affecting any construction contract, and
 amendments thereto, that purport to insure or indemnify, including the cost to defend, the builder, as defined in Section 911, or the general contractor or contractor not affiliated with the builder, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 911, by a subcontractor against liability for claims of construction defects are unenforceable to the extent the claims arise out of, pertain to, or relate to the negligence of the builder or contractor or the builder’s or contractor’s other agents, other servants, or other independent contractors who are directly responsible to the builder, or for defects in design furnished by those persons, or to the extent the claims do not arise out of, pertain to, or relate to the scope of work in the written agreement between the parties. This section shall not be waived or modified by contractual agreement, act, or omission of the parties. Contractual provisions, clauses, covenants, or agreements not expressly prohibited herein are reserved to the agreement of the parties.
 Nothing in this subdivision shall prevent any party from exercising its rights under subdivision (a) of Section 910. This subdivision shall not affect the obligations of an insurance carrier under the holding of Presley Homes, Inc. v. American States Insurance Company (2001) 90 Cal.App.4th 571. Nor shall this subdivision affect the obligations of a builder or subcontractor pursuant to Title 7 (commencing with Section 895) of Part 2 of Division 2.

(e) Subdivision (d) does not prohibit a subcontractor and builder or general contractor from mutually agreeing to the timing or immediacy of the defense and provisions for reimbursement of defense fees and costs, so long as that agreement does not waive or modify the provisions of subdivision (d) subject, however, to paragraphs (1) and (2). A subcontractor shall owe no defense or indemnity obligation to a builder or general contractor for a construction defect claim unless and until the builder or
 general contractor provides a written tender of the claim, or portion thereof, to the subcontractor which includes all of the information provided to the builder or general contractor by the claimant or claimants, including, but not limited to, information provided pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 910, relating to claims caused by that subcontractor’s scope of work. This written tender shall have the same force and effect as a notice of commencement of a legal proceeding. If a builder or general contractor tenders a claim for construction defects, or a portion thereof, to a subcontractor in the manner specified by this provision, the subcontractor shall elect to perform either of the following, the performance of which shall be deemed to satisfy the subcontractor’s defense obligation to the builder or general contractor:

(1) Defend the claim with counsel of its choice, and the subcontractor shall maintain control of the defense for any
 claim or portion of claim to which the defense obligation applies. If a subcontractor elects to defend under this paragraph, the subcontractor shall provide written notice of the election to the builder or general contractor within a reasonable time period following receipt of the written tender, and in no event later than 90 days following that receipt. Consistent with subdivision (d), the defense by the subcontractor shall be a complete defense of the builder or general contractor of all claims or portions thereof to the extent alleged to be caused by the subcontractor, including any vicarious liability claims against the builder or general contractor resulting from the subcontractor’s scope of work, but not including claims resulting from the scope of work, actions, or omissions of the builder, general contractor, or any other party. Any vicarious liability imposed upon a builder or general contractor for claims caused by the subcontractor electing to defend under this paragraph shall be directly
 enforceable against the subcontractor by the builder, general contractor, or claimant.

(2) Pay, within 30 days of receipt of an invoice from the builder or general contractor, no more than a reasonable allocated share of the builder’s or general contractor’s defense fees and costs, on an ongoing basis during the pendency of the claim, subject to reallocation consistent with subdivision (d), and including any amounts reallocated upon final resolution of the claim, either by settlement or judgment. The builder or general contractor shall allocate a share to itself to the extent a claim or claims are alleged to be caused by its work, actions, or omissions, and a share to each subcontractor to the extent a claim or claims are alleged to be caused by the subcontractor’s work, actions, or omissions, regardless of whether the builder or general contractor actually tenders the claim to any particular subcontractor, and regardless of whether that
 subcontractor is participating in the defense. Any amounts not collected from any particular subcontractor may not be collected from any other subcontractor.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a subcontractor fails to timely and adequately perform its obligations under paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), the builder or general contractor shall have the right to pursue a claim against the subcontractor for any resulting compensatory damages, consequential damages, and reasonable attorney’s fees. If a subcontractor fails to timely perform its obligations under paragraph (2) of subdivision (e), the builder or general contractor shall have the right to pursue a claim against the subcontractor for any resulting compensatory and consequential damages, as well as for interest on defense and indemnity costs, from the date incurred, at the rate set forth in subdivision (g) of Section 3260, and for the builder’s or general contractor’s
 reasonable attorney’s fees incurred to recover these amounts. The builder or general contractor shall bear the burden of proof to establish both the subcontractor’s failure to perform under either paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (e) and any resulting damages. If, upon request by a subcontractor, a builder or general contractor does not reallocate defense fees to subcontractors within 30 days following final resolution of the claim as described above, the subcontractor shall have the right to pursue a claim against the builder or general contractor for any resulting compensatory and consequential damages, as well as for interest on the fees, from the date of final resolution of the claim, at the rate set forth in subdivision (g) of Section 3260, and the subcontractor’s reasonable attorney’s fees incurred in connection therewith. The subcontractor shall bear the burden of proof to establish both the failure to reallocate the fees and any resulting damages. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the parties
 from mutually agreeing to reasonable contractual provisions for damages if any party fails to elect for or perform its obligations as stated in this section.

(g) A builder, general contractor, or subcontractor shall have the right to seek equitable indemnity for any claim governed by this section.

(h) Nothing in this section limits, restricts, or prohibits the right of a builder, general contractor, or subcontractor to seek equitable indemnity against any supplier, design professional, or product manufacturer.

(i) As used in this section, “construction defect” means a violation of the standards set forth in Sections 896 and 897.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 707, Sec. 2.   (SB 474)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2782.05.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), provisions, clauses, covenants, and agreements contained in, collateral to, or affecting any construction contract and amendments thereto entered into on or after January 1, 2013, that purport to insure or indemnify, including the cost to defend, a general contractor, construction manager, or other subcontractor, by a subcontractor against liability for claims of death or bodily injury to persons, injury to property, or
 any other loss, damage, or expense are void and unenforceable to the extent the claims arise out of, pertain to, or relate to the active negligence or willful misconduct of that general contractor, construction manager, or other subcontractor, or their other agents, other servants, or other independent contractors who are responsible to the general contractor, construction manager, or other subcontractor, or for defects in design furnished by those persons, or to the extent the claims do not arise out of the scope of work of the subcontractor pursuant to the construction contract. This section shall not be waived or modified by contractual agreement, act, or omission of the parties. Contractual provisions, clauses, covenants, or agreements not expressly prohibited herein are reserved to the agreement of the parties. This section shall not affect the obligations of an insurance carrier under the holding of Presley Homes, Inc. v. American States Insurance Company (2001) 90 Cal.App.4th 571, nor the rights of an
 insurance carrier under the holding of Buss v. Superior Court (1997) 16 Cal.4th 35.

(b) This section does not apply to:

(1) Contracts for residential construction that are subject to any part of Title 7 (commencing with Section 895) of Part 2 of Division 2.

(2) Direct contracts with a public agency that are governed by subdivision (b) of Section 2782.

(3) Direct contracts with the owner of privately owned real property to be improved that are governed by subdivision (c) of Section 2782.

(4) Any wrap-up insurance policy or program.

(5) A cause of action for breach of contract or warranty that exists independently of an
 indemnity obligation.

(6) A provision in a construction contract that requires the promisor to purchase or maintain insurance covering the acts or omissions of the promisor, including additional insurance endorsements covering the acts or omissions of the promisor during ongoing and completed operations.

(7) Indemnity provisions contained in loan and financing documents, other than construction contracts to which the contractor and a contracting project owner’s lender are parties.

(8) General agreements of indemnity required by sureties as a condition of execution of bonds for construction contracts.

(9) The benefits and protections provided by the workers’ compensation laws.

(10) The
 benefits or protections provided by the governmental immunity laws.

(11) Provisions that require the purchase of any of the following:

(A) Owners and contractors protective liability insurance.

(B) Railroad protective liability insurance.

(C) Contractors all-risk insurance.

(D) Builders all-risk or named perils property insurance.

(12) Contracts with design professionals.

(13) Any agreement between a promisor and an admitted surety insurer regarding the promisor’s obligations as a principal or indemnitor on a bond.

(c) Notwithstanding any choice-of-law rules that would apply the laws of another jurisdiction, the law of California shall apply to every contract to which this section applies.

(d) Any waiver of the provisions of this section is contrary to public policy and is void and unenforceable.

(e) Subdivision (a) does not prohibit a subcontractor and a general contractor or construction manager from mutually agreeing to the timing or immediacy of the defense and provisions for reimbursement of defense fees and costs, so long as that agreement does not waive or modify the provisions of subdivision (a) subject, however, to paragraphs (1) and (2). A subcontractor shall owe no defense or indemnity obligation to a general contractor or construction manager for a claim unless and until the general contractor or construction manager
 provides a written tender of the claim, or portion thereof, to the subcontractor that includes the information provided by the claimant or claimants relating to claims caused by that subcontractor’s scope of work. In addition, the general contractor or construction manager shall provide a written statement regarding how the reasonable allocated share of fees and costs was determined. The written tender shall have the same force and effect as a notice of commencement of a legal proceeding. If a general contractor or construction manager tenders a claim, or portion thereof, to a subcontractor in the manner specified by this subdivision, the subcontractor shall elect to perform either of the following, the performance of which shall be deemed to satisfy the subcontractor’s defense obligation to the general contractor or construction manager:

(1) Defend the claim with counsel of its choice, and the subcontractor shall maintain control of the
 defense for any claim or portion of claim to which the defense obligation applies. If a subcontractor elects to defend under this paragraph, the subcontractor shall provide written notice of the election to the general contractor or construction manager within a reasonable time period following receipt of the written tender, and in no event later than 30 days following that receipt. Consistent with subdivision (a), the defense by the subcontractor shall be a complete defense of the general contractor or construction manager of all claims or portions thereof to the extent alleged to be caused by the subcontractor, including any vicarious liability claims against the general contractor or construction manager resulting from the subcontractor’s scope of work, but not including claims resulting from the scope of work, actions, or omissions of the general contractor or construction manager, or any other party. Any vicarious liability imposed upon a general contractor or construction manager for claims caused by
 the subcontractor electing to defend under this paragraph shall be directly enforceable against the subcontractor by the general contractor, construction manager, or claimant. All information, documentation, or evidence, if any, relating to a subcontractor’s assertion that another party is responsible for the claim shall be provided by that subcontractor to the general contractor or construction manager that tendered the claim.

(2) Pay, within 30 days of receipt of an invoice from the general contractor or construction manager, no more than a reasonable allocated share of the general contractor’s or construction manager’s defense fees and costs, on an ongoing basis during the pendency of the claim, subject to reallocation consistent with subdivision (a), and including any amounts reallocated upon final resolution of the claim, either by settlement or judgment. The general contractor or construction manager shall allocate a share to itself to
 the extent a claim or claims are alleged to be caused by its work, actions, or omissions, and a share to each subcontractor to the extent a claim or claims are alleged to be caused by the subcontractor’s work, actions, or omissions, regardless of whether the general contractor or construction manager actually tenders the claim to any particular subcontractor, and regardless of whether that subcontractor is participating in the defense. Any amounts not collected from any particular subcontractor may not be collected from any other subcontractor.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a subcontractor fails to timely and adequately perform its obligations under paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), the general contractor or construction manager shall have the right to pursue a claim against the subcontractor for any resulting compensatory damages, consequential damages, and reasonable attorney’s fees. If a subcontractor fails to timely
 perform its obligations under paragraph (2) of subdivision (e), the general contractor or construction manager shall have the right to pursue a claim against the subcontractor for any resulting compensatory damages, interest on defense and indemnity costs, from the date incurred, at the rate set forth in subdivision (g) of Section 3260, consequential damages, and reasonable attorney’s fees incurred to recover these amounts. The general contractor or construction manager shall bear the burden of proof to establish both the subcontractor’s failure to perform under either paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (e) and any resulting damages. If, upon request by a subcontractor, a general contractor or construction manager does not reallocate defense fees to subcontractors within 30 days following final resolution of the claim, the subcontractor shall have the right to pursue a claim against the general contractor or construction manager for any resulting compensatory damages with interest, from the date of final
 resolution of the claim, at the rate set forth in subdivision (g) of Section 3260. The subcontractor shall bear the burden of proof to establish both the failure to reallocate the fees and any resulting damages. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the parties from mutually agreeing to reasonable contractual provisions for damages if any party fails to elect for or perform its obligations as stated in this section.

(g) For purposes of this section, “construction manager” means a person or entity, other than a public agency or owner of privately owned real property to be improved, who is contracted by a public agency or the owner of privately owned real property to be improved to direct, schedule, or coordinate the work of contractors for a work of improvement, but does not itself perform the work.

(h) For purposes of this section, “general contractor,” in relation to a given
 subcontractor, means a person who has entered into a construction contract and who has entered into a subcontract with that subcontractor under which the subcontractor agrees to perform a portion of that scope of work. Where a subcontractor has itself subcontracted a portion of its work, that subcontractor, along with its general contractor, shall be considered a general contractor as to its subcontractors.

(i) For purposes of this section, “subcontractor” means a person who has entered into a construction contract either with a contractor to perform a portion of that contractor’s work under a construction contract or with any person to perform a construction contract subject to the direction or control of a general contractor or construction manager.

(j) A general contractor, construction manager, or subcontractor shall have the right to seek equitable indemnity for any claim
 governed by this section.

(k) Nothing in this section limits, restricts, or prohibits the right of a general contractor, construction manager, or subcontractor to seek equitable indemnity against any supplier, design professional, product manufacturer, or other independent contractor or subcontractor.

(l) This section shall not affect the validity of any existing insurance contract or agreement, including, but not limited to, a contract or agreement for workers’ compensation or an agreement issued on or before January 1, 2012, by an admitted insurer, as defined in the Insurance Code.

(m) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the obligation, if any, of either a contractor or construction manager to indemnify, including defending or paying the costs to defend, a public agency against any claim arising
 from the alleged active negligence of the public agency under subdivision (b) of Section 2782 or to indemnify, including defending or paying the costs to defend, an owner of privately owned real property to be improved against any claim arising from the alleged active negligence of the owner under subdivision (c) of Section 2782.

(n) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the obligation, if any, of either a contractor or construction manager to provide or maintain insurance covering the acts or omissions of the promisor, including additional insurance endorsements covering the acts or omissions of the promisor during ongoing and completed operations pursuant to a construction contract with a public agency under subdivision (b) of Section 2782 or an owner of privately owned real property to be improved under subdivision (c) of Section 2782.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 707, Sec. 3.   (SB 474)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2782.1.
